Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6281.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) The director shall establish standards pursuant to this act to ensure the purity and quality of gasoline and diesel fuel sold or offered for sale in this state. (2) The director shall establish standards for the amount and type of additives allowed to be included in gasoline and diesel fuel. (3) The director shall establish standards for the grading of gasoline, including, but not limited to, subregular with a minimum 85 AKI, regular with a minimum 87 AKI and a minimum 82 MON, midgrade 88 with a minimum 88 AKI and a minimum 82 MON, midgrade 89 with a minimum 89 AKI and a minimum 83 MON, premium with a minimum 90 AKI, premium 91 with a minimum 91 AKI, premium 92 with a minimum 92 AKI, premium 93 with a minimum 93 AKI, and premium 94 with a minimum 94 AKI. (4) The director shall establish standards for vapor pressure in conformity with federal law including, but not limited to, section 211(h) of part A of title II of the clean air act, 42 USC 7545, and the vapor pressure standards and waivers described in 40 CFR 1090.215, and as specified by the American society for testing and materials, Society for Testing and Materials except as otherwise required to conform to federal or state law. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 10d, the director shall establish the vapor pressure as 9.0 pounds per square inch (psi) for retail outlets during the period beginning June 1 through September 15 of each year, except for dispensing facilities in counties where the director establishes the vapor pressure as 7.0 psi or 7.8 psi in the year 2007 and thereafter. As used in this act, "vapor pressure" means the vapor pressure of gasoline or gasoline oxygenate blend as determined by ASTM test method D6378 or D5191 or an ASTM method approved by the department. (5) In establishing additive and grading standards the director shall adopt the latest standards for gasoline established by the American society for testing and materials Society for Testing and Materials and shall adopt the latest standards for gasoline established by federal law or regulation. The standards established by the director shall must not prohibit a gasoline blend that is permitted by a valid waiver granted by the United States environmental protection agency E.P.A. pursuant to the fuel or fuel additive waiver in section 211(f)(4) of part A of title II of the clean air act, 42 USC 7545, and the ethanol waiver of 1.0 psi in section 211(h)(4) of part A of title II of the clean air act, 42 USC 7545, if the gasoline blend meets all of the conditions set forth in the waiver. Beginning June 1, 2003, the The director shall not permit the use of the additive methyl tertiary butyl ether (MTBE) in this state. (6) The director shall establish standards pursuant to this act to ensure the purity and quality of diesel fuel sold or offered for sale in this state. No later than June 1, 2009, the director shall make available for public comment proposed standards to ensure the purity and quality of diesel fuel that is biodiesel or a biodiesel blend, including, but not limited to, a biodiesel blend designated as B20. (7) Any firm offering hydrogen fuel for sale in this state shall first register with and obtain approval from the department. Registration shall must include a complete list of the fuel specifications the product is to meet and the sites where the product is offered for sale to the general public. (8) Standards established pursuant to this section shall must be by rules promulgated pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 10d. Beginning June 1 through September 15 of 2007 and for that period of time each subsequent year, the vapor pressure standard shall be 7.0 psi for dispensing facilities in Wayne, Oakland, Macomb, Washtenaw, Livingston, Monroe, St. Clair, and Lenawee counties. The director retains the authority to implement the vapor pressure 7.0 psi requirement or 7.8 psi requirement in areas where it is determined necessary to attain or maintain national ambient air quality standards. If an area of the state that is required to use a low vapor pressure fuel of 7.8 psi or 7.0 psi has been redesignated by the United States environmental protection agency as in attainment of national ambient air quality standards, and the Michigan department of environmental quality has demonstrated that maintenance of the national ambient air quality standards can be achieved without the use of low vapor pressure fuel, the director may, with the approval of the United States environmental protection agency, terminate the low vapor pressure fuel requirement for that area. (1) The director may implement requirements in conformity with federal law including, but not limited to, section 211(h) of part A of title II of the clean air act, 42 USC 7545, and the vapor pressure standards and waivers described in 40 CFR 1090.215. (2) Notwithstanding anything in this act to the contrary, E15 fuel may be sold all year long. (3) A fuel pump that dispenses E15 fuel must be labeled consistent with federal law. (4) As used in this section, "E15 fuel" means gasoline blended with 10.5% to 15% ethanol.